test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-kuell_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kueʹll e-stem: # Noun 'fish/kala' - full paradigm
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Nom: kueʹll
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Gen: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Acc: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Ill: kuâlla
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Loc: kueʹlest
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Com: [kueʹlin, kuõʹlin]
     kueʹll+N+Ess: kueʹllen
     kueʹll+N+Par: kueʹlled
     kueʹll+N+Sg+Abe: kueʹltää
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Nom: kueʹl
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Gen: [kueʹli, kuõʹli]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Acc: [kueʹlid, kuõʹlid]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Ill: [kueʹlid, kuõʹlid]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Loc: [kueʹlin, kuõʹlin]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Com: [kueʹlivuiʹm, kuõʹlivuiʹm]
     kueʹll+N+Pl+Abe: [kueʹlitää, kuõʹlitää]
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: kueʹlteʹm
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: kueʹlteeʹm
     kueʹll+N+Der/teʹm+A+Attr: kueʹlteʹmes
     kueʹll+N+Der/t+A+Comp: kueʹltab
     kueʹll+N+Der/t+A+Der/umus+Superl: kueʹltumus
